Hawaii statutes.
§806-33 Surplusage. Any unnecessary
allegation contained in an indictment may be rejected as surplusage. [L 1915, c
215, pt of §2; RL 1925, §4046; RL 1935, §5505; RL 1945, §10807; RL 1955,
§258-17; HRS §711-33; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Rules of Court

Surplusage, see HRPP rule 7(e).

Case Notes

Giving a wrong name to the offense charged does not vitiate
the charge, it being regarded as surplusage. 11 H. 143 (1897).

Cited: 36 H. 550, 552 (1943), aff'd 150 F.2d 545 (1945).

See 33 H. 686 (1936).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next